Utah statutes.
75-7-305.   Appointment of guardian ad litem or other representative.
(1)  If the court determines that an interest is not represented under this
part, or that the otherwise available representation might be inadequate, the
court may appoint a guardian ad litem or other representative to receive
notice, give consent, and otherwise represent, bind, and act on behalf of a
minor, incapacitated or protected person, or unborn individual, or a person
whose identity or location is unknown.  A guardian ad litem or other
representative may be appointed to represent several persons or interests.
(2)  A guardian ad litem or other representative may act on behalf of the
individual represented with respect to any matter arising under this chapter,
whether or not a judicial proceeding concerning the trust is pending.
(3)  In making decisions, a guardian ad litem or other representative may
consider general benefit accruing to the living members of the individual's
family.
